Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.100

Final record—What to contain.

The clerk of the court shall make a final record of all the proceedings in a criminal prosecution within six months after the same shall have been decided, which shall contain a copy of the minutes of the challenge to the panel of the grand jury, the indictment or information, journal entries, pleadings, minutes of challenges to panel of petit jurors, judgment, orders, or decision, and bill of exceptions.

[ 1891 c 28 s 85; Code 1881 s 1134; 1873 p 245 s 292; 1854 p 125 s 156; RRS s 2224.]